District of Columbia statutes.
8-1779.02

Limitation of expenditures.

The Mayor shall not expend, except in accordance with a state energy plan identified in § 8-1779.01, any revenues owed or accruing to the District of Columbia (“District”) on or after January 27, 1986, as a result of action taken by the United States Department of Energy pursuant to the following authority:

(1)

12 U.S.C. § 1904, note, as incorporated by 15 U.S.C. § 754(a)(1) [expired];

(2)

15 U.S.C. § 757 et seq. [expired];

(3)

42 U.S.C. § 7101 et seq.; and

(4)

Section 155 of a Joint Resolution Making further continuing appropriations and providing for productive employment for the fiscal year 1983, and for other purposes, effective December 21, 1982 (96 Stat. 1830) [Public Law 97-377, § 155, 96 Stat. 1919].

History

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-173, § 3, 33 DCR 7224

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-912.

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 2-912.
1981 Ed., § 1-1912.

References in Text

15 U.S.C. §§ 754 and 757, referred to in (1) and (2), respectively, have been omitted pursuant to the terms of former 15 U.S.C. § 760g.